North Carolina, session 2025, HB249.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the nonrecurring sum of ten thousand one hundred twelve
dollars ($10,112) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the Department of Parks,
Recreation and Tourism Management in the College of Natural Resources at North Carolina State
University for a pilot program located in Wake County seeking to enhance diversity in the sport
of pickleball. Pickleball provides important public health benefits. In older adults, pickleball has
been found to help participants meet (or exceed) CDC requirements for physical activity, increase
social and community connections, and contribute to psychological well-being. The sport also
has the capacity to help all ages with intergenerational connections, enhance critical thinking,
and facilitate social collaboration. Currently the sport is underrepresented by people of color
despite it having the capacity to be multicultural and socioeconomically inclusive since it has a
low cost of entry, high ease of play, and is offered through public recreational facilities. The pilot
program shall consist of the following: (i) at least two focus groups with people of color to gain
insight into how to best create and promote a program aimed to increase diversity among
pickleball participants; (ii) creation of a branded program, including name, logo, and physical
and digital marketing materials; (iii) marketing of the program, in coordination with community
partners, using websites, social media, direct email, event days, and demonstrations; (iv) a
four-week session held both in the fall of 2025 and the spring of 2026 at Method Road and Chavis
recreation centers in Raleigh; and (v) post-program evaluation and creation of a toolkit that can
be used to implement similar programs for parks and recreation departments and other
community organizations across NC. Funds appropriated in this section do not revert but remain
available to the Department for the purposes provided herein.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H249-v-1*